Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 9. Conservator's Report

§ 3-3-901.
Conservator shall report and account.

A conservator shall present to the court and file in the conservatorship proceedings a written verified report and accounting of his administration:

Annually, within sixty (60) days following the anniversary date of his appointment, unless the court otherwise orders on good cause shown;

Upon filing his resignation and before his resignation is accepted by the court;

Within thirty (30) days following the date of his removal;

Within sixty (60) days following the date of termination of the conservatorship, unless that time is extended by the court;

At other times as the court may order.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited in

Bratton v. Blenkinsop (In re Bratton), 2015 WY 157,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Dec. 29, 2015).

§ 3-3-902.
Requirement of report and accounting.

The report and accounting required by W.S.

3-3-901

shall account for all of the assets, property and income of the ward during the period since the close of the last previous accounting, and shall include the following information so far as applicable:

The balance of funds on hand at the close of the previous accounting, and all amounts received from whatever source during the period covered by the accounting;

An itemized account of all disbursements made during the period covered by the accounting;

Changes in investments since the last previous report, including a list of all assets and recommendations of the conservator for the retention or disposition of any property held by the conservator;

The amount of the bond of the conservator and the name of the surety;

The residence or physical location of the ward;

The general physical and mental conditions of the ward;

A description of those duties the conservator is exercising under W.S.

3-3-606

and

3-3-607

; and

Such other information necessary to show the condition of the affairs of the conservatorship.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited in

Bratton v. Blenkinsop (In re Bratton), 2015 WY 157,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Dec. 29, 2015).